Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-4,125
LPD-learner's
permit; LPE-learner's permit; violations; impoundment or revocation of permit;
effect on eligibility for operator's license;
not eligible for ignition interlock permit.

(1) For any minor convicted
or adjudicated of violating the terms of an LPD-learner's permit issued pursuant
to section 60-4,123 or an LPE-learner's permit issued pursuant to section
60-4,124, the court shall, in addition to any other penalty or disposition,
order the impoundment or revocation of such learner's permit and order that
such minor shall not be eligible for another operator's license or school,
farm, LPD-learner's, or LPE-learner's permit until he or she has attained
the age of sixteen years.

(2) Any person
who holds an LPD-learner's permit issued pursuant to section 60-4,123 and
has violated subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of section 28-306, subdivision (3)(b)
or (c) of section 28-394, or section 28-1254, 60-6,196, 60-6,197, or 60-6,197.06
shall not be eligible for an ignition interlock permit.

(3) A
copy of the court's abstract or adjudication shall be transmitted to the director
who shall place in an impound status or revoke the LPD-learner's or LPE-learner's
permit of such minor in accordance with the order of the court and not again
issue another operator's license or school, farm, LPD-learner's, or LPE-learner's
permit to such minor until such minor has attained the age of sixteen years.

Laws 1963, c. 359, § 7, p. 1153;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409.05;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 75;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 13;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 34;

Laws 2004, LB 353, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 29.